Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2485
Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act, how cited.

Sections 71-2485 to 71-2495 shall be known and may be cited as the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act.

Laws 2020, LB1124, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 4.